Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 10 Archaeological, Geological and Historical Museums

Cross references. —

For authority of director of state archives and historical department to assemble archaeological, historical, etc., collections, see §

9-2-414

.

As to powers of cities and towns to establish and maintain public museums, see § 15-1-103(a)(xxxii).